New Jersey, session 222, A2299.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  (New section) a.  It shall be unlawful to sell, license, or otherwise provide to a landlord an algorithmic device that sets, recommends, or advises on rents or occupancy rates that may be achieved for residential dwelling units in the State. b.  It shall be unlawful for a landlord to use an algorithmic device when setting rents or occupancy rates for residential dwelling units in the State.  Each separate month that a violation exists or continues, and each separate residential dwelling unit for which the landlord uses an algorithmic device, shall constitute a separate and distinct violation. c.  In addition to the penalties established pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1970, c.73 (C.56:9-7), the Attorney General may file a civil action for a violation of subsection a. or b. of this section, or both, for damages, injunctive relief, restitution or return of illegal profits, civil penalties of up to $1000 per violation, or some combination of these penalties.  The court shall award reasonable attorneys fees and costs to the Attorney General if the Attorney General is the prevailing party in such a civil action. 2.  Section 2 of P.L.1970, c.73 (C.56:9-2) is amended to read as follows: a.  As used in this act, unless the context otherwise requires "person" shall mean any natural person or persons, or any corporation, partnership, company, trust or association of persons. b.   "Trade or commerce" shall include all economic activity involving or relating to any commodity or service. c.   "Commodity" shall mean any kind of real or personal property. d.   "Service" shall mean any activity which is performed in whole or in part for the purpose of financial gain, including but not limited to sale, rental, leasing or licensing for use. e.  "Algorithmic device" shall mean a device, such as a software program, that uses one or more algorithms to perform calculations of non-public competitor data concerning local, statewide, or regional rents or occupancy rates, for the purpose of advising a landlord whether to leave a unit vacant or on the amount of rent that the landlord requires from a tenant.  "Algorithmic device" shall include a product or service that incorporates an algorithmic device, but does not include: (1) any report published by a trade association that receives renter data and publishes it in an aggregated and anonymous manner; or (2) a product used for the purpose of establishing rent or income limits in accordance with the affordable housing program guidelines of a government entity. f.  "Non-public competitor data" shall mean information that is not available to the general public, including information about actual rent prices, occupancy rates, lease start and end dates, and other related data, regardless of whether the information is attributable to a specific competitor or anonymized, or whether it is derived from, or otherwise provided by, another person that competes in the same market or a related market. (cf: P.L.1970, c.73, s.2) 3.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the second month next following enactment.